District of Columbia statutes.
8-108.01

Restrictions on bisphenol-A.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no individual or legal entity shall manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or distribute in commerce any empty bottle, cup, or other container that:

(1)

Contains bisphenol-A; and

(2)

Is designed or intended by the manufacturer to be filled with food or liquid for consumption by a child under the age of 4.

(b)

Facilities licensed to provide medical care may use Food and Drug Administration-approved, medically essential products containing bisphenol-A if a suitable alternative is unavailable.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-336, § 2, 58 DCR 605
Delegation of Authority under D.C. Law 18-336, to the Director of the District Department of the Environment under the Human and Environmental Health Protection Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2011-153, September 7, 2011 ( 58 DCR 8091).
Section 8 of D.C. Law 18-336 provided: “Sec. 8. Applicability. This act shall apply as of July 1, 2011.”